District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.36

Additional penalty for impaired operating with a minor in the watercraft.

A person convicted of any offense under this part who, at the time of operation or physical control of the watercraft had a minor, other than him or herself, in the watercraft, shall, in addition to any applicable penalty under this part, be fined a minimum of $500 and not more than $1,000 per minor, and be incarcerated a mandatory-minimum term of incarceration of 5 days per minor. The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3o
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 113(f)(6), 59 DCR 12957

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 113(f)(6) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes